Rhode Island statutes. Title 46 Waters and Navigation
Chapter 17.2 Antifoulant Paint Control

46-17.2-1.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the “Tributyltin Antifoulant Paint Control Act”.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 568, § 1.

46-17.2-2.
Legislative findings.

The General Assembly finds the following:

Antifoulant paints containing tributyltin based biocides are widely used on vessels in the state to inhibit the growth of marine fouling organisms, such as barnacles, that increase drag and reduce vessel speed and fuel and operating efficiency;

Laboratory and field studies have shown that tributyltin is highly toxic to marine and fresh water organisms, especially mollusks and juvenile life stages, at extremely low concentrations;

The United States Environmental Protection Agency has determined that concentrations of tributyltin currently in the waters of the United States may pose unreasonable risks to oysters, clams, fish, and other marine life;

The continued unrestricted use of tributyltin based antifoulant paints in this state poses a threat to commercially important fish and shellfish species and may ultimately pose a threat to public health;

Vessels less than sixty-five (65) meters in length that are coated with tributyltin antifoulant paint account for a substantial amount of the tributyltin released into the aquatic environment, especially in restricted bays and inlets where tributyltin concentrations are most likely to build to dangerous levels; and

Most antifoulant paint containing tributyltin that is used on vessels less than sixty-five (65) meters in length is applied during the spring months prior to the summer boating season.

The purpose of this chapter is to protect the living marine and fresh water resources of the state, as well as public health, by sharply restricting the use of antifoulant paints containing tributyltin and thus reducing the amount of tributyltin entering the waters of the state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 568, § 1.

46-17.2-3.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Acceptable release rate” means a measured release rate not to exceed 4.0 micrograms per square centimeter per day for weeks three (3) to five (5), and a cumulative release rate of one hundred sixty-eight (168) micrograms per square centimeter for the first fourteen (14) days as determined in accordance with an United States Environmental Protection Agency (EPA) testing procedure as outlined in the EPA data call-in notice of July 29, 1986, on tributyltin in antifoulant paints under the federal Insecticide, Fungicide and Rodenticide Act, 7 USC, § 136. If a lower release rate is determined by the department to be necessary to protect health or the environment, the rate if duly adopted by regulatory action of the department, shall be the acceptable release rate as herein defined.

“Commercial boat yard” means any facility which engages for hire in the construction, storage, maintenance, repair, or refurbishing of vessels (other than seaplanes), or any licensed independent marine maintenance contractor who engages in such activities.

“Department” means the department of environmental management.

“Marine antifoulant paint” means any compound, coating, paint, or treatment applied or used for the purpose of controlling fresh water or marine fouling organisms on vessels.

“Tributyltin compounds” means any compound having three (3) normal butyl groups attached to a tin atom and with or without an anion such as chloride, fluoride, or oxide.

“Vessel” means every description of watercraft, other than a seaplane, used or capable of being used as a means of transportation on the water, whether self-propelled or otherwise, and includes barges and tugs.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 568, § 1.

46-17.2-4.
Sale and application of tributyltin compounds.

Except as provided in this chapter, a person may not distribute, possess, sell, offer for sale, apply, or offer for use or application any marine antifoulant paint containing tributyltin compounds. Authorized personnel of the department of environmental management, department of the attorney general, and state police may seize any antifoulant paint held in violation of this chapter and any seized substances shall be considered forfeited.

A person may distribute or sell a marine antifoulant paint containing tributyltin with an acceptable release rate to the owner or agent of a commercial boat yard. The owner or agent of a commercial boat yard may possess and apply, or purchase for application, an antifoulant paint containing tributyltin with an acceptable release rate; however, the paint may be applied only within a commercial boat yard and only to vessels which exceed sixty-five feet (65´) in length or which have aluminum hulls, or to vessels less than sixty-five feet (65´) in length if it is applied only to the outboard or lower drive unit of the vessels.

A person may distribute, sell or apply, a marine antifoulant paint containing tributyltin having an acceptable release rate if the paint is distributed or sold in a spray can in a quantity of sixteen ounces (16 oz.) avoirdupois or less, and is commonly referred to as outboard or lower unit paint.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 568, § 1.

46-17.2-5.
Education programs.

Through cooperative programs the department shall begin immediately to develop and implement a program designed to inform interstate and intrastate paint manufacturers and distributors, vessel owners, and commercial boat yards in the state of properties of tributyltin in marine antifoulant paints and the law to restrict its use.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 568, § 1.

46-17.2-6.
Severability.

If any clause, sentence, paragraph, section, or part of this chapter shall be adjudged by any court of competent jurisdiction to be invalid, such judgment shall not affect, impair or invalidate the remainder thereof, but shall be confined in its operation to the clause, sentence, paragraph, section, or part adjudged invalid.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 568, § 1.

46-17.2-7.
Penalty.

Any person who violates the provisions of this chapter shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or by imprisonment for not more than one year, or both a fine and imprisonment.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 568, § 1.

46-17.2-8.
Regulations.

Provisions of this chapter shall be in compliance with the rules and regulations relating to pesticides promulgated by the department of environmental management under provisions of the Rhode Island Pesticide Control Act of 1976, chapter 25 of title 23.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 568, § 1.